Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2608
Commission on African American Affairs Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Commission on African American Affairs Cash Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be administered by the Commission on African American Affairs. The fund shall consist of money from contracts, fees, gifts, grants, or bequests from nonfederal sources received by the state and any investment income earned on the fund. The fund may be used to support the commission's operations pursuant to sections 81-2601 to 81-2607. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 30.
April 2, 2024
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.